src/pron-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX-1A
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:с 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.SG@" "@C.TPERS@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "+Nom":0 "@P.TNUM.PL@" "@C.TPERS@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:н 0:е "+Det":0 "+Pl":0 "@P.DNUM.PL@"> kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
+Det+Gen:%>О1нть Clitic ;
          kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

LEXICON kal-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+Dat":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Trans:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON lak-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>О1шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+Dat":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Trans:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON kit-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+Dat":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>О1нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>О1в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Trans:%>О1кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGen_CX-2
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Abl:%>дО1  kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Comp:%>шка kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Dat:%>нень  PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Det":0 "+SG":0 "+Dat":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@" > Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Gen:%>нь PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ill:%>с PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Lat:%>в PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX ;
+Trans:%>кс osh-PersPronGenCX_DX ;

LEXICON kal-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON osh-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;

LEXICON kudo-PersPronGenCX_DX
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:ь "+Det":0 "+Gen":0 "+SG":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
     PersPronGenCX_DX-1 ;


LEXICON PersPronGenCX_DX-1
!< "+Indet":0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitic ;
 Clitic; 



LEXICON PossPX1
< 0:">" 0:н 0:Ь2 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м  "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:Ь2 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:т 0:Ь2 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:з 0:О1 "+3Sg":0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:О1 0:к "+1Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:к "+2Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:т "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:н 0:с 0:т "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitic ;

LEXICON PronTag
+Pron: Clitic ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
! =========== !
! Conjugation !
! =========== !

LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> osh-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> kudo-Tenses1 ;



LEXICON kit-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Use/Sub/Short":0 "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;


LEXICON lak-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses1
 Clitic ;
 Tenses1_A  ; !This provides a linking vowel

LEXICON osh-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses1
 Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;



LEXICON Tenses1_A
< 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Pres":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+1Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+2Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+3Sg":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+1Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+2Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Prt2":0 "+3Pl":0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitic ;






! These have been introduced with the flag: <"@P.INDEF.PREF@">
! There is a counterpart which doesn't take a prefix.
! Only the counterpart is available for post-clitic -Гак
! Or relative pronoun/interrogative pronoun
!
LEXICON  Indef_Pronouns-pref
+Der/кой:кой- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/та:та- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/таго:таго- Indef_Pronouns ;


LEXICON  Indef_Pronouns


кие+Pron+Nom.Sg:кие Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кие+Pron+Nom.Sg:ки Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кие+Pron:ки kudo-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
ко+Pron+Interr:ко Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
ков+Spat+Lat:ков Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кода+Pron+Manner:кода Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Nom+Sg:кодамУ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Nom+Pl:кодат Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Pl+Det+Nom:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Pl+Det:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
кодамо+Adn:кодамУ2 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
кува+Spat+Prl:кува Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

кона+Adn+Nom+Sg:кона Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кона+Adn:кона Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

зярдо+Pron+Abl:зярдо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron+Nom:зяро Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron:зяро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зяродо+Pron+Interr+Abl:зяродо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!зяро+Pron+Interr+Ela:зяросто Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron+Ill:зярс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зярдо+Pron+Alb+Gen:зярдонь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

знярдо+Pron+Abl:знярдо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron+Nom:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зняро+Pron+Ela:зняросто Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron+Ill:знярс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
знярдо+Pron+Abl+Gen:знярдонь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

мезе+Pron+Nom+Sg:мезе Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron:мезь osh-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
мезе+Pron:мезе PossPX1 ;
!мезень+Pron+Interr+Gen:мезень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мень+Adn+Dep+Gen:мень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron:мезИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!мезе+Pron+Nom+Pl:мезть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+OldOrth+Nom+Pl:месть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мекс+Pron+Transl:мекс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron:мейИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!мезе+Pron+Transl:мезекс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron+Abl:мезде Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron+Dat:мезнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron+Abl+Det:мезденть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron+Ine:мейсэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!мезе+Pron+Com:мезнек # ;




LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+VLoss+Pl+Nom:%>VLossтЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ela+Gen:%>стО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine+Gen:%>сО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>сО1 Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>зО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>зО1нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

+Nom.Def.Sg:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen.Def.Sg:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Def.Sg.Dat:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen:%>тнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat:%>тненень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>О1стО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine:%>О1сО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>О1с Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Tra:%>О1кс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ela+Gen:%>О1стО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine+Gen:%>О1сО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen:%>О1нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Com:%>нек Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

+Nom.Def.Sg:%>О1сь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen.Def.Sg:%>О1нть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Def.Sg.Dat:%>О1нтень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen:%>тнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat:%>тненень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl:%>тнеде Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela:%>тнестэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine:%>тнесэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill:%>тнес Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat:%>тнев Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra:%>тнекс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe:%>тневтеме Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp:%>тнешка Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl.Indef.Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 

+Ela:%>стО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ela+Gen:%>стО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine+Gen:%>сО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>сО1 Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>зО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>зО1нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

+Nom.Def.Sg:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen.Def.Sg:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Def.Sg.Dat:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen:%>тнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat:%>тненень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;


LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic
<"@R.INDEF.PREF@"> Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-pref ;
<"@D.INDEF.PREF@"> Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-post ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-pref
+Pref+Clit+Indef: # ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-post
+Der/бути+Clt+Indef:%-бути # ;
+Der/Гак+Clt+Indef:%>Г1ак # ;
+Relat:  # ;
+Interr:  # ;
